Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-960
Cold storage plants; management; rates.

When any cold storage or refrigeration plant shall have been established under section 17-956, the municipality shall provide by ordinance for the management thereof and the rates to be charged and the manner of payment for such cold storage or refrigeration plant service to be furnished. In municipalities maintaining a system of waterworks and having a water commissioner, he or she shall have charge of the cold storage or refrigeration plant unless the local governing body shall otherwise provide by the ordinance which shall establish rules and regulations to govern and control such utility.

Laws 1941, c. 24, § 4, p. 119;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-804;

R.S.1943, § 17-960;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 292.